Indiana, session 2026, SB289.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-13-8-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.230-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) All public funds of all political subdivisions
other than counties shall be deposited in the designated depositories
located in the respective territorial limits of the political subdivisions,
except as provided in this section.
(b) Each board of finance of a political subdivision:
(1) that is not a city or town; and
(2) whose jurisdiction crosses one (1) or more county lines;
may limit its boundaries for the purpose of this section to that portion
of the political subdivision within the county where its principal office
is located.
(c) For a political subdivision that is not a county, if there is no
principal office or branch of a financial institution located in the county
in which the political subdivision is located or in the political
subdivision, or if no financial institution with a principal office or
branch in the county in which the political subdivision is located or
SB 289—LS 6607/DI 101


in the political subdivision will accept public funds under this chapter,
the board of finance of the county and the boards of finance of the
political subdivisions in the county shall designate one (1) or more
financial institutions with a principal office or branch outside of the
county or political subdivision, and in the state, as a depository or
depositories. For a county, if there is no principal office or branch
of a financial institution located in the county or in a county
contiguous to the county that is located in Indiana, or if no
financial institution with a principal office or branch in the county
or in a county contiguous to the county that is located in Indiana
will accept public funds under this chapter, the board of finance of
the county shall designate one (1) or more financial institutions in
Indiana with a principal office or branch outside of the county or
outside a county contiguous to the county that is located in Indiana
as a depository or depositories.
(d) The board of trustees for a hospital organized or operated under
IC 16-22-1 through IC 16-22-5 or IC 16-23-1 may invest any money in
the hospital fund anywhere in the state with any financial institution
designated by the state board of finance as depositories for state
deposits.
(e) This subsection applies to a political subdivision that is not
a county. If two (2) or fewer financial institutions that have a branch
or principal office in a the county or in which the political
subdivision is located or in the political subdivision are willing to
accept public funds, the board of finance for the county or political
subdivision may:
(1) treat the financial institutions that are located within the
county or political subdivision as if the financial institutions were
not located within the county or political subdivision; and
(2) designate one (1) or more financial institutions to receive
public funds under the requirements of subsection (c).
(f) The investing officer shall maintain the deposits as follows:
(1) In one (1) or more depositories designated for the political
subdivision, if the sum of the monthly average balances of all the
transaction accounts for the political subdivision does not exceed
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(2) In each depository designated for the political subdivision, if
subdivision (1) does not apply and fewer than three (3) financial
institutions are designated by the local board of finance as a
depository.
(3) In at least two (2) depositories designated for the political
subdivision, if subdivision (1) does not apply and at least three (3)
SB 289—LS 6607/DI 101


financial institutions are designated by the local board of finance
as a depository.
(g) Subject to subsections (c) and (e), subsections (c), (e), and (h),
a board of finance of a political subdivision that is not a:
(1) city;
(2) town; or
(3) hospital described in subsection (d);
shall invest the public funds of the political subdivision in a designated
depository located anywhere in the county in which the political
subdivision is located. For purposes of this section, the territorial limits
of a political subdivision that is not a city, town, or local hospital
authority or corporation are the territorial limits of the county in which
the principal office of the board of finance is located.
(h) This subsection applies to a county. If two (2) or fewer
financial institutions that have a branch or principal office in a
county or in a county contiguous to the county that is located in
Indiana are willing to accept public funds, the board of finance for
the county may:
(1) treat the financial institutions that are located within the
county or a county contiguous to the county that is located in
Indiana as if the financial institutions were not located within
the county or a county contiguous to the county; and
(2) designate one (1) or more financial institutions to receive
public funds under the requirements of subsection (c).
SB 289—LS 6607/DI 101


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Insurance and Financial
Institutions, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 289, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 1, delete lines 13 through 17, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(c) For a political subdivision that is not a county, if there is no
principal office or branch of a financial institution located in the county
in which the political subdivision is located or in the political
subdivision, or if no financial institution with a principal office or
branch in the county in which the political subdivision is located or
in the political subdivision will accept public funds under this chapter,
the board of finance of the county and the boards of finance of the
political subdivisions in the county shall designate one (1) or more
financial institutions with a principal office or branch outside of the
county or political subdivision, and in the state, as a depository or
depositories. For a county, if there is no principal office or branch
of a financial institution located in the county or in a county
contiguous to the county that is located in Indiana, or if no
financial institution with a principal office or branch in the county
or in a county contiguous to the county that is located in Indiana
will accept public funds under this chapter, the board of finance of
the county shall designate one (1) or more financial institutions in
Indiana with a principal office or branch outside of the county or
outside a county contiguous to the county that is located in Indiana
as a depository or depositories.".
Page 2, delete lines 1 through 3.
Page 2, line 9, after "(e)" insert "This subsection applies to a
political subdivision that is not a county.".
Page 2, line 10, strike "or" and insert "in which the political
subdivision is located or in the".
Page 2, line 31, strike "subsections (c) and (e)," and insert
"subsections (c), (e), and (h),".
Page 2, delete line 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(h) This subsection applies to a county. If two (2) or fewer
financial institutions that have a branch or principal office in a
county or in a county contiguous to the county that is located in
Indiana are willing to accept public funds, the board of finance for
the county may:
SB 289—LS 6607/DI 101


(1) treat the financial institutions that are located within the
county or a county contiguous to the county that is located in
Indiana as if the financial institutions were not located within
the county or a county contiguous to the county; and
(2) designate one (1) or more financial institutions to receive
public funds under the requirements of subsection (c).".
Delete page 3.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to SB 289 as introduced.)
BALDWIN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 1.
SB 289—LS 6607/DI 101